North Carolina, session 2025, SB920.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Health and Human Services, Division of Social Services (Division), the sum of three million
eight hundred eighty-eight thousand ten dollars ($3,888,010) in nonrecurring funds for the
2026-2027 fiscal year to cover the loss of federal receipts for the administrative costs of the
federal Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program (SNAP) as a result of Public Law 119-21.
The Division shall allocate these funds to the Forsyth County Department of Social Services to
cover the loss of federal receipts for the administrative costs of SNAP as a result of Public Law
119-21. The Division shall only allocate the portion of these appropriated funds up to the actual
amount of lost federal receipts.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2026.
*S920-v-1*